District of Columbia statutes.
16-1703

Relief from further penalty upon discovery and repayment of losses.

Upon the discovery and repayment of the money or other thing to be discovered and repaid as provided by section 16-1702 , the person who so discovers and repays shall be acquitted, indemnified, and discharged from any further or other punishment, forfeiture, or penalty, that he may have incurred by the playing for, or winning, the money or other thing so discovered and repaid.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 583, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1703.
1973 Ed., § 16-1703.